Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.700

Unlawful release of court and law enforcement employee information—Damages, fees, and costs.

Any person whose personal information is made available on the world wide web as described in RCW 4.24.680(1) who suffers damages as a result of such conduct may bring an action against the person or organization who makes such information available, for actual damages sustained plus damages in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars for each day the personal information was made available on the world wide web, and reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

[ 2006 c 355 s 3; 2002 c 336 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Severability—2006 c 355: See notes following RCW 4.24.680.